Utah statutes.
41-3-502.   Special plates -- Permit to use dealer plate to demonstrate
loaded motor vehicle.
(1)  Under rules established by the administrator, the division may issue a
permit to a dealer to use a dealer plate to demonstrate a loaded motor vehicle
to a bona fide prospective purchaser.
(2)  To obtain a permit, the dealer or his authorized representative shall
apply on a form prescribed by the division.
(3)  If approved and issued, the permit shall be carried in the motor vehicle
for which it is issued during the demonstration trip and shall be returned to
the  division properly completed and signed within ten days after its
expiration date.
